Utah statutes.
51-7-11.5.   Certified investment advisers -- Scope of and limits to
authority.
(1)  Certified investment advisers may not make any investments that are
inconsistent with this chapter or rules of the council.
(2)  Certified investment advisers acting on behalf of a public treasurer
shall conduct investment transactions only through qualified depositories,
certified dealers, or directly with issuers of the investment securities.
